tests/verbs-runy.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../zab.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../zab.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "habitual":
    uny<v><tv><hab> : runy
    # uny<v><tv><hab> : ruhny
    uny<v><tv><hab>+a<prn><pers><p1><sg> : runya
    #uny<v><tv><hab>+a<prn><pers><p1><sg> : ruʼunyaʼ
    uny<v><tv><hab>+ën<prn><pers><p1><pl> : rienyën
    # uny<v><tv><hab>+ën<prn><pers><p1><pl> : rieʼnyëhnn

  "perfective":
    uny<v><tv><perf> : beiny
    # uny<v><tv><perf> : bèèiʼny
    uny<v><tv><perf>+a<prn><pers><p1><sg> : beinya
    uny<v><tv><perf>+ën<prn><pers><p1><pl> : bienyën
    # uny<v><tv><perf>+ën<prn><pers><p1><pl> : bieʼnyëhnn

  "irrealis":
    uny<v><tv><irre> : guny
    # uny<v><tv><irre> : guuny
    uny<v><tv><irre>+a<prn><pers><p1><sg> : gunya
    #uny<v><tv><irre>+a<prn><pers><p1><sg> : guʼunyaʼ
    uny<v><tv><irre>+ën<prn><pers><p1><pl> : gyienyën
    # uny<v><tv><irre>+ën<prn><pers><p1><pl> : gyieʼnyëhnn

  "progressive":
    uny<v><tv><prog> : cayuny
    # uny<v><tv><prog> : cayuhny
    uny<v><tv><prog>+a<prn><pers><p1><sg> : cayunya
    #uny<v><tv><prog>+a<prn><pers><p1><sg> : cayuʼunyaʼ
    uny<v><tv><prog>+ën<prn><pers><p1><pl> : cayienyën
    # uny<v><tv><prog>+ën<prn><pers><p1><pl> : cayieʼnyëhnn
